Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202279-3102
Legislative findings.

The Legislature finds that the COVID-19 pandemic has impacted the health and well-being of students throughout Nebraska, resulting in the need for a scalable support system and report line to enhance the safety and well-being of students in each elementary and secondary school.

Laws 2021, LB322, § 2.